Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB515.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Household Appliance Freedom Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commonwealth agency." Any office, department, authority, board, multistate agency or commission of the executive branch."Municipality." Any of the following:(1) A county, city, borough, incorporated town or township.1234567891011121314151617 (2) A home rule, optional plan or optional charter municipality.(3) Any other general purpose unit of government established by the General Assembly.(4) A municipal authority.(5) An entity formed under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 23 Subch. A (relating to intergovernmental cooperation)."Policy." A requirement, including a zoning or building code requirement or restriction, which is imposed by statute regulation, ordinance, resolution, rule, guideline, code, general or specific plan provision or otherwise.Section 3. Prohibition on restrictions on household appliances.A Commonwealth agency or municipality may not adopt a policy to prohibit the sale, installation or use of any of the following:(1) Natural gas-powered home heating equipment.(2) Natural gas-powered home appliances.(3) Grills, stoves and other food preparation appliances designed to be used outdoors.(4) Natural gas powered-torches, lamps and other features designed to be used outdoors.(5) Any other home or outdoor appliances or heating equipment powered by a specific energy source.Section 4. Civil actions authorized.A person who alleges a violation of section 3 may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction for injunctive relief or other appropriate damages within 180 days after the occurrence of the alleged violation.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0515PN0497 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930